el: Τύπος επένδυσης αθλητικού στηθόδεσμου: Διαμορφωμένα cup; Κανένα; Ενίσχυση push-up; Αφαιρούμενη ενίσχυση; Ραμμένη ενίσχυση; Άλλο
sl-SI: Vrsta blazinjenja športnega modrčka: Oblikovane košarice; Brez; Podloga z učinkom push-up; Odstranljive blazinice; Všite blazinice; Drugo
hr-HR: Sportski grudnjak tipa razmak u podnožju: Oblikovane košarice; Bez podstave; Push-up podstava; Uklonjivi jastučići; Ušiveni jastučići; Ostalo
vi: Loại đệm áo ngực thể thao: Cúp ngực đúc; Không có; Đệm nâng ngực; Đệm tháo rời được; Đệm may liền; Khác
es: Tipo de relleno del sujetador deportivo: Copas moldeadas; Ninguno; Relleno push-up; Almohadillas extraíbles; Almohadillas cosidas; Otro
zh-TW: 運動內衣襯墊類型: 一體成型罩杯; 無; 集中托高襯墊; 可拆式襯墊; 縫合式襯墊; 其他
zh-CN: 运动文胸内边距型: 模杯; 无垫; 聚拢胸垫; 可拆卸胸垫; 内置固定胸垫; 其他
ru: Тип вставок спортивного бюстгальтера: Формованные чашечки; Нет; С эффектом пуш-ап; Съемные вкладыши; Вшитые вкладыши; Другое
pl: Typ wypełnienia biustonosza sportowego: Miseczki formowane termicznie; Brak; Wkładki push-up; Wyjmowane wkładki; Wszyte wkładki; Inne
fr: Type de rembourrage de la brassière de sport: Bonnets moulés; Aucun; Rembourrage pigeonnant; Coussinets amovibles; Coussinets intégrés; Autre
da: Type af polstring i sports-bh: Formstøbte skåle; Ingen; Push-up-indlæg; Udtagelige indlæg; Indsyede indlæg; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de bojo do top esportivo: Bojos moldados; Nenhum; Bojo push-up; Bojos removíveis; Bojos costurados; Outro
it: Tipo di imbottitura interna del reggiseno sportivo: Coppe preformate; Nessuna; Imbottitura push-up; Cuscinetti rimovibili; Cuscinetti cuciti; Altro
th: ประเภทแผ่นรองในสปอร์ตบรา: คัพขึ้นรูป; ไม่มี; ฟองน้ำดันทรง; ฟองน้ำถอดออกได้; ฟองน้ำเย็บติด; อื่นๆ
ro-RO: Tipul de căptușeală al sutienului sport: Cupe mulate; Niciuna; Căptușeală push-up; Bureți detașabili; Bureți cusuți; Altele
sk-SK: Športová podprsenka s vnútorným okrajom: Tvarované košíčky; Žiadne; Push-up výstelka; Odnímateľné vypchávky; Všité vypchávky; Iné
lt-LT: Sportinės liemenėlės paminkštinimo tipas: Formuoti kaušeliai; Nėra; Pakeliantys įdėklai; Išimami įdėklai; Įsiūti įdėklai; Kita
en: Sports bra padding type: Molded cups; None; Push-up padding; Removable pads; Sewn-in pads; Other
ko: 스포츠 브라 패딩 유형: 몰드 컵; 없음; 푸시업 패딩; 탈착식 패드; 일체형 패드; 기타
pt-PT: Tipo de enchimento do soutien desportivo: Copas moldadas; Nenhum; Enchimento push-up; Almofadas amovíveis; Almofadas cosidas; Outro
fi: Urheiluliivien toppauksen tyyppi: Muotoillut kupit; Ei täytettä; Push-up-toppaus; Irrotettavat toppaukset; Kiinniommellut toppaukset; Muu
bg-BG: Тип подплънки на спортен сутиен: Формовани чашки; Няма; Push-up подплънки; Свалящи се подплънки; Зашити подплънки; Друго
hu: Sportmelltartó bélésének típusa: Formázott kosarak; Nincs; Push-up párnázás; Kivehető betétek; Bevarrt betétek; Egyéb
tr: Spor sütyeni ped tipi: Kalıplı kuplar; Yok; Destekli dolgu; Çıkarılabilir pedler; Dikili pedler; Diğer
de: Art der Sport-BH-Polsterung: Vorgeformte Cups; Keine; Push-up-Polsterung; Herausnehmbare Polster; Eingenähte Polster; Sonstige
cs: Typ vnitřního okraje sportovní podprsenky: Tvarované košíčky; Bez výztuže; Push-up výztuž; Vyjímatelné vycpávky; Všité vycpávky; Jiné
nb: Sports-BH-polstringstype: Støpte skåler; Ingen; Push-up-innlegg; Avtakbare innlegg; Innsydde innlegg; Annet
sv: Sport-bh – vaddering: Formgjutna kupor; Ingen; Push-up-vaddering; Uttagbara inlägg; Insydda inlägg; Övrigt
ja: スポーツブラパッドタイプ: モールドカップ; なし; プッシュアップパッド; 取り外し可能パッド; 縫い付けパッド; その他
nl: Sportbeha vullingstype: Voorgevormde cups; Geen; Push-up-vulling; Uitneembare vullingen; Ingenaaide vullingen; Overige